Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1347
County roads; city and village streets; authority to use for detour; duties of department.

Authority is granted to the department to use any road or street as a detour for the state highway system. During the time that said detour is in effect, the same shall in all respects be the responsibility of the department; Provided, that such authority and responsibility shall become effective only after due written notice is given to the governing body having primary authority for such road or street. The responsibility of the department shall cease only upon written notice being duly given to such authorities. At the time of the termination of the use of such road or street as a state highway, the same shall be returned to the responsibility of the primary authority in as good condition as it was at the time of said temporary taking for use as a state highway by the department.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 47, p. 438.